Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1330.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.2232, is amended to read: 609.2232 CONSECUTIVE SENTENCES FOR ASSAULTS COMMITTED BY STATE PRISON INMATES. new text begin (a) new text end If an inmate of a state correctional facility is convicted of violating section 609.221, 609.222, 609.223, 609.2231, or 609.224, while confined in the facility, the sentence imposed for the assault shall be executed and run consecutively to any unexpired portion of the offender's earlier sentence. The inmate is not entitled to credit against the sentence imposed for the assault for time served in confinement for the earlier sentence. The inmate shall serve the sentence for the assault in a state correctional facility even if the assault conviction was for a misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor. new text begin (b) If an inmate of a county jail, county regional jail, county work farm, county workhouse, or other local correctional facility is convicted of violating section 609.221, 609.222, 609.223, 609.2231, or 609.224 while confined in the facility and the victim is a county sheriff or sheriff's deputy, the sentence imposed for the assault shall be executed and run consecutively to any sentence previously imposed or that may be imposed for any crime or offense for which the person was in custody when the person committed the assault. The inmate is not entitled to credit against the sentence imposed for the assault for time served in confinement for the earlier sentence. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end